Vermont statutes. Title 9 Commerce and Trade
Subchapter 2. Charitable Solicitations

§ 2471.
Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Charitable” means related to a charitable purpose.

“Charitable organization” means any organization that is or holds itself out to be furthering any charitable purpose.

“Charitable purpose” means any benevolent, educational, philanthropic, humane, patriotic, social welfare, advocacy, public health, environmental conservation, or civic objective or any objective of law enforcement officers, firefighters, or other persons who protect the public safety.

“Contribution” means the grant, promise, or pledge of money, credit, financial assistance, or other goods or services in part or in whole for a charitable purpose.

“Contributor” means a person who makes a contribution.

“Fundraising campaign” means an effort undertaken during a specific time period by a paid fundraiser to solicit contributions on behalf of a charitable organization.

“Gross receipts” mean all receipts before deduction of any administrative or operating expenses.

“Paid fundraiser” means a person who, for financial consideration, solicits contributions from persons in this State, either directly or through employees, agents, or those with whom the paid fundraiser is in privity. A paid fundraiser does not include:

Any person who, for compensation, plans, manages, advises, or consults in connection with the solicitation of contributions in this State, but does not solicit contributions; except that if the compensation is in whole or in part dependent on the number or value of contributions received, the person shall be considered a paid fundraiser.

Any person who for profit is regularly and primarily engaged in trade or commerce in this State other than in connection with the raising of funds for charitable purposes and who represents to the public that an amount per unit of goods or services purchased by the public will benefit a charitable purpose.

A bona fide officer or employee of a charitable organization.

A person who solicits for an educational institution at which he or she is a bona fide student, unless the person is paid compensation that is in whole or in part dependent upon the number or value of contributions received.

“Solicit” and “solicitation” mean the direct or indirect request for a contribution, including the solicitor’s offer or attempt to sell any property, rights, services, or other thing, in connection with which:

The name of any charitable organization or name similar to any charitable organization is used as an inducement for making the contribution or consummating the sale.

Any statement is made that implies that the whole or any part of the contribution will be donated to any charitable organization or will go to any charitable purpose. A solicitation shall be deemed to have taken place when the request for a contribution is made and at the place where the request is received, whether or not the person making the solicitation receives a contribution. A request or appeal on behalf of a candidate for office or a political committee is not a solicitation.

HISTORY:

Added

1989, No. 232

(Adj. Sess.), § 2; amended

1991, No. 102

.

§ 2472.
Contracts between paid fundraisers and charitable organizations.

Prior to soliciting in this State, a paid fundraiser shall enter into a written contract with the charitable organization on whose behalf solicitations are to be made. The contract shall contain the following:

A minimum percentage of the gross receipts of the fundraising campaign to be paid to the charitable organization.

An itemized description of all expenses, commissions, and other amounts that are to be deducted from the receipts of the fundraising campaign, how they are to be calculated, and to whom they are to be paid.

An authorized signature of the charitable organization indicating approval of the terms of the contract.

The following statement in immediate proximity to the signature of the charitable organization, in a minimum size of 10 points:

Chapter 63 of Title 9 of the Vermont Statutes Annotated requires a paid fundraiser to provide the fundraiser’s charitable sponsor, within 60 days after the end of a solicitation campaign, with a statement setting out the name and address of each contributor and the amount of the contribution; the amount of the gross receipts; and an itemized list of all expenses, commissions, and other costs incurred in the campaign.
The law also gives charities other rights, including the right to cancel this contract or to recover damages, or both, in certain circumstances.
Contact the Vermont Attorney General for further information.

A provision that prohibits the paid fundraiser from restricting in any way the use by the charitable organization of the list of donors to the campaign.

Prior to commencing a solicitation, a paid fundraiser shall:

Provide to the charitable organization on whose behalf solicitations are to be made, the wording to be used by the paid fundraiser when conducting written solicitations and a copy of any script to be used in conducting telephone or in-person solicitation.

Obtain written approval from the charitable organization for the use of such wording and script.

A charitable organization may rescind any contract with a paid fundraiser and have all contributions in the possession of the paid fundraiser returned to the contributors if the contract or the paid fundraiser does not comply with this subchapter.

Upon application for State funds received through a grant or contract, a charitable organization shall disclose:

the actual percentage of gross receipts of any fundraising campaign paid to the charitable organization within the two previous fiscal years; and

the minimum contracted percentage of gross receipts to be paid by a paid fundraiser to the charitable organization in any current or known future fundraising campaign.

HISTORY:

Added

1989, No. 232

(Adj. Sess.), § 2; amended

2003, No. 51

, § 2.

§ 2473.
Notice of solicitation.

At least 10 days prior to the commencement of a fundraising campaign, a paid fundraiser shall file with the Attorney General a notice of solicitation on a form prescribed by the Attorney General. The notice of solicitation shall contain the following:

the name, permanent address, and permanent telephone number of the paid fundraiser and, if the paid fundraiser is a business entity, of each of its principal officers and directors;

the name, address, and telephone number of the charitable organization on behalf of which solicitations are to be made;

the nature, location, dates, parties, and outcome of any litigation or investigation concerning the fundraiser’s solicitation activity in any jurisdiction occurring within six years prior to the commencement of the fundraising campaign in this State;

the nature and anticipated starting and ending dates of the solicitation campaign;

the address and telephone number from which the solicitation will be conducted;

the names and addresses of all employees and agents of, and individuals in privity with, the paid fundraiser who will solicit during the campaign, and whether any of these persons have been convicted of a felony or of a misdemeanor involving dishonesty arising from a charitable solicitation;

the name and address of any member of the immediate family of an officer, director, or owner of the paid fundraiser and the name and address of any entity owned in whole or in part by an officer, director, or owner of the paid fundraiser with whom the paid fundraiser will incur expenses in connection with the solicitation campaign;

a copy of the contract between the paid fundraiser and the charitable organization;

such other information as the Attorney General may by rule require.

The notice of solicitation shall be accompanied by a bond approved by the Attorney General in the amount of $20,000.00. The bond shall run to the State and to any person who may have a cause of action against the paid fundraiser for any liability arising under this subchapter, as long as the action on the bond is brought within two years after accrual of the cause of action.

A separate notice of solicitation shall be required to be filed for each separate solicitation campaign to be undertaken on behalf of a charitable organization. However, only one bond shall be required to be in effect at the same time for any one fundraiser, regardless of the number of notices of solicitation filed.

Any material change in any information contained in a notice of solicitation shall be reported to the Attorney General in writing not more than seven days after the change occurs.

The Attorney General may adopt rules to require that:

the notice of solicitation be filed electronically, with proper verification;

the paid fundraiser provide an electronic copy of the contract with the notice of solicitation or provide a copy of the contract upon request of the Attorney General; and

the paid fundraiser provide an electronic copy of the bond with the notice of solicitation or provide a copy of the bond upon request of the Attorney General.

For each calendar year in which a paid fundraiser solicits in this State on behalf of a charitable organization, the paid fundraiser shall pay a registration fee of $500.00 to the Attorney General no later than ten days prior to its first solicitation in this State.
(f) (1) For each calendar year in which a paid fundraiser solicits in this State on behalf of a charitable organization, the paid fundraiser shall pay a registration fee of $500.00 to the Attorney General no later than ten days prior to its first solicitation in this State.

Each notice of solicitation filed in accordance with this section shall be accompanied by a fee of $200.00. In the case of a campaign lasting more than 12 months, an additional $200.00 fee shall be paid annually on or before the date of the anniversary of the commencement of the campaign.

Fees paid under this subsection shall be deposited in a special fund managed pursuant to 32 V.S.A. chapter 7, subchapter 5, and shall be available to the Attorney General for the costs of administering sections 2471-2479 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1989, No. 232

(Adj. Sess.), § 2; amended

2003, No. 110

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. May 11, 2004;

2013, No. 72

, § 32;

2015, No. 57

, § 29, eff. June 11, 2015.

§ 2474.
Notice not to be used as an endorsement.

A paid fundraiser shall not use or exploit the fact of filing a notice of solicitation to create the impression that the State has in any way endorsed or approved a solicitation or solicitation campaign.

HISTORY:

Added

1989, No. 232

(Adj. Sess.), § 2.

§ 2475.
Solicitations.

No paid fundraiser shall misrepresent, directly or indirectly, his or her relationship to a charitable organization.

No paid fundraiser or charitable organization shall misrepresent, directly or indirectly, to a contributor or potential contributor any fact relating to the solicitation, including the percentage of the contribution that will be paid over to the charitable organization or the purpose for which the contribution will be used.

No paid fundraiser shall represent, directly or indirectly, that any part of the contributions received will be given or donated to any charitable organization unless the organization has previously consented in writing to the use of its name.

The provisions of this section shall also apply to any person that a paid fundraiser employs or engages, directly or indirectly, to solicit contributions.

No paid fundraiser shall solicit a contribution from any person in this State without clearly and conspicuously disclosing to the person, both orally, if the paid fundraiser is soliciting in whole or in part by telephone, and in writing, if the paid fundraiser is soliciting in whole or in part by means of writing:

that the solicitor is being paid by the charitable organization on whose behalf the solicitation is being made; and

how the potential contributor may obtain information from the State on the respective percentages of contributions that will be paid to the charitable organization and to the paid fundraiser.

HISTORY:

Added

1989, No. 232

(Adj. Sess.), § 2; amended

1997, No. 42

, §§ 3, 4;

2003, No. 51

, § 3.

§ 2476.
Bank accounts.

All checks and money orders contributed in response to a solicitation shall be made out to the name of the charitable organization.

A paid fundraiser shall immediately deposit, in a bank account in the name of the charitable organization with which the paid fundraiser has contracted, all contributions received by the paid fundraiser. The signature of the treasurer or other agent designated by the charitable organization shall be required to remove any funds from the account.

Within 60 days after a solicitation campaign has been completed, the paid fundraiser shall file with the charitable organization a closing statement for the campaign, including the name and address of each contributor and the amount of the contribution; the amount of gross receipts; and an itemized list of all expenses, commissions, and other costs incurred in the campaign.

HISTORY:

Added

1989, No. 232

(Adj. Sess.), § 2.

§ 2477.
Financial report.

No later than 90 days after a fundraising campaign has been completed, and no later than 90 days after the anniversary of the commencement of a fundraising campaign lasting more than one year, a paid fundraiser that has solicited contributions in this State shall file a financial report with the Attorney General on a form prescribed by the Attorney General. The information required by this section shall pertain to the entire fundraising campaign, or, in the case of a campaign lasting more than one year, to the 12 months ending on the most recent anniversary of the commencement of the campaign.

The financial report shall contain the following:

Total gross receipts.

A description of how the gross receipts were distributed, including an itemized list of all expenses, commissions, and other costs of the fundraising campaign, and the net amount paid to the charitable organization for its charitable purposes, after payment of all fundraising expenses, commissions, and other costs.

The percentage of gross receipts represented by the total of fundraising expenses, commissions, and other costs.

The percentage of gross receipts represented by the net amount paid to the charitable organization for its charitable purposes, after payment of all fundraising expenses, commissions, and other costs.

The signature of the charitable organization.

Such other information as the Attorney General may by rule require.

The Attorney General may adopt rules requiring that the financial report be filed electronically, with proper verification.

HISTORY:

Added

1989, No. 232

(Adj. Sess.), § 2; amended

2003, No. 110

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. May 11, 2004.

§ 2478.
Records required.

A paid fundraiser shall maintain such records as the Attorney General may by rule require for three years from the end of the solicitation campaign to which they pertain.

Whenever the Attorney General has reason to believe that a paid fundraiser has violated this subchapter, the Attorney General may inspect all records required to be maintained by a paid fundraiser except that the identities of the contributors shall be available for inspection by the Attorney General upon request, only through a civil investigation conducted pursuant to subsection 2479(b) of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1989, No. 232

(Adj. Sess.), § 2.

§ 2479.
Violations.

A violation of this subchapter, including the filing of any false information on a notice of solicitation or financial report, is deemed to be a violation of section 2453 of this title. This section shall not be construed to limit a paid fundraiser’s liability under any other law.

The Attorney General has the same authority to make rules, conduct civil investigations, and bring civil actions with respect to the acts and practices of paid fundraisers and charitable organizations as is provided under subchapter 1 of this chapter.

A contributor or a charitable organization has the same rights with respect to the acts and practices of a paid fundraiser as a consumer has under section 2461 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1989, No. 232

(Adj. Sess.), § 2; amended

1997, No. 42

, § 5.